Florida, session 2026, HB635.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
30
31 Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 282.3185, Florida
32 Statutes, is amended to read:
33 282.3185 Local government cybersecurity.—
34 (4) CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS.—
35 (a)1. A local government may only adopt cybersecurity
36 standards Each local government shall adopt cybersecurity
37 standards that safeguard its data, information technology, and
38 information technology resources to ensure availability,
39 confidentiality, and integrity. The cybersecurity standards must
40 be consistent with the standards and processes established by
41 the department through the Florida Digital Service pursuant to
42 s. 282.318 generally accepted best practices for cybersecurity,
43 including the National Institute of Standards and Technology
44 Cybersecurity Framework. The department may not delegate the
45 authority to set cybersecurity standards to a local government.
46 2. Unless otherwise required by state or federal laws or
47 regulations, a vendor shall comply with cybersecurity standards
48 consistent with the standards and processes established by The
49 National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST)
50 Cybersecurity Framework 2.0. For purposes of this subparagraph,
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb635-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 635 2026
51 "vendor" means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation,
52 trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other commercial
53 entity.
54 (b) This subsection preempts any prior cybersecurity
55 standards or processes adopted by a local government that are
56 inconsistent with this subsection Each county with a population
57 of 75,000 or more must adopt the cybersecurity standards
58 required by this subsection by January 1, 2024. Each county with
59 a population of less than 75,000 must adopt the cybersecurity
60 standards required by this subsection by January 1, 2025.
61 (c) Each municipality with a population of 25,000 or more
62 must adopt the cybersecurity standards required by this
63 subsection by January 1, 2024. Each municipality with a
64 population of less than 25,000 must adopt the cybersecurity
65 standards required by this subsection by January 1, 2025.
66 (d) Each local government shall notify the Florida Digital
67 Service of its compliance with this subsection as soon as
68 possible.
69 Section 2. Section 768.401, Florida Statutes, is created
70 to read:
71 768.401 Limitation on liability for cybersecurity
72 incidents.—
73 (1) As used in this section, the term:
74 (a) "Covered entity" means a sole proprietorship,
75 partnership, corporation, trust, estate, cooperative,
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb635-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 635 2026
76 association, or other commercial entity.
77 (b) "Cybersecurity standards or frameworks" means one or
78 more of the following:
79 1. The National Institute of Standards and Technology
80 (NIST) Cybersecurity Framework 2.0;
81 2. NIST special publication 800-171;
82 3. NIST special publications 800-53 and 800-53A;
83 4. The Federal Risk and Authorization Management Program
84 security assessment framework;
85 5. The Center for Internet Security (CIS) Critical
86 Security Controls;
87 6. The International Organization for
88 Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission 27000
89 series (ISO/IEC 27000) family of standards;
90 7. HITRUST Common Security Framework (CSF);
91 8. Service Organization Control Type 2 Framework (SOC 2);
92 9. Secure Controls Framework; or
93 10. Other similar industry frameworks or standards.
94 (c) "Disaster recovery" has the same meaning as in s.
95 282.0041.
96 (d) "Local government" means a county, municipality, or
97 other political subdivision of this state.
98 (e) "Personal information" has the same meaning as in s.
99 501.171(1).
100 (f) "Third-party agent" means an entity that has been
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb635-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 635 2026
101 contracted to maintain, store, or process personal information
102 on behalf of a covered entity.
103 (2) A local government is not liable in connection with a
104 cybersecurity incident if the local government has implemented
105 one or more policies that substantially comply with
106 cybersecurity standards or align with cybersecurity frameworks,
107 disaster recovery plans for cybersecurity incidents, and multi-
108 factor authentication.
109 (3) A covered entity or third-party agent that acquires,
110 maintains, stores, processes, or uses personal information has a
111 presumption against liability in a class action resulting from a
112 cybersecurity incident if the covered entity or third-party
113 agent has a cybersecurity program that does all of the
114 following, as applicable:
115 (a) Substantially complies with s. 501.171(3)-(6), as
116 applicable.
117 (b) Has implemented:
118 1. One or more policies that substantially comply with
119 cybersecurity standards or align with cybersecurity frameworks,
120 a disaster recovery plan for cybersecurity incidents, and multi-
121 factor authentication; or
122 2. If regulated by the state or Federal Government, or
123 both, or if otherwise subject to the requirements of any of the
124 following laws and regulations, a cybersecurity program that
125 substantially complies with the current version of such laws and
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb635-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 635 2026
126 regulations, as applicable:
127 a. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
128 of 1996 security requirements in 45 C.F.R. part 160 and part 164
129 subparts A and C.
130 b. Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, Pub. L.
131 No. 106-102, as amended, and its implementing regulations.
132 c. The Federal Information Security Modernization Act of
133 2014, Pub. L. No. 113-283.
134 d. The Health Information Technology for Economic and
135 Clinical Health Act requirements in 45 C.F.R. parts 160 and 164.
136 e. The Criminal Justice Information Services (CJIS)
137 Security Policy.
138 f. Other similar requirements mandated by state or federal
139 laws or regulations.
140 (4) A covered entity's or third-party agent's
141 cybersecurity program's compliance with paragraph (3)(b) may be
142 demonstrated by providing documentation or other evidence of an
143 assessment, conducted internally or by a third-party, reflecting
144 that the covered entity's or third-party agent's cybersecurity
145 program has implemented the requirements of that paragraph.
146 (5) Any covered entity or third-party agent must update
147 its cybersecurity program to incorporate any revisions of
148 relevant frameworks or standards or of applicable state or
149 federal laws or regulations within 1 year after the latest
150 publication date stated in any such revisions in order to retain
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb635-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 635 2026
151 protection from liability.
152 (6) This section does not establish a private cause of
153 action.
154 (7) If a civil action is filed against a local government,
155 covered entity, or third-party agent that failed to implement a
156 cybersecurity program in compliance with this section, the fact
157 that such defendant could have obtained a liability shield or
158 presumption against liability upon compliance is not admissible
159 as evidence of negligence, does not constitute negligence per
160 se, and may not be used as evidence of fault under any other
161 theory of liability.
162 (8) In a civil action relating to a cybersecurity
163 incident, if the defendant is a local government covered by
164 subsection (2) or a covered entity or third-party agent covered
165 by subsection (3), the defendant has the burden of proof to
166 establish substantial compliance with this section.
167 (9) This section applies to any putative class action
168 filed before, on, or after the effective date of this act.
169 Section 3. The Division of Law Revision is directed to
170 replace the phrase "the effective date of this act" wherever it
171 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law.
172 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb635-00